Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 3

Juvenile Alcohol Abuse

33-10-301. Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds that any proposition to increase the legal drinking age raises many issues and involves many organizations in both the public and private sector. First, a disproportionate number of fatal highway accidents involve both people under twenty-five (25) years of age and the use of alcoholic beverages. Second, the public school system is not consistently using a curriculum that emphasizes the effects of alcoholic beverages on individuals and their communities. Third, resources for early intervention programs for high-risk children who abuse alcoholic beverages are widely scattered and often unavailable to many children. Fourth, the state does not presently operate or have a contractual relationship for residential treatment facilities for the care and treatment of children who abuse alcoholic beverages and other drugs. Fifth, sanctions for present violations of the Tennessee alcoholic beverage and beer licensing statutes concerning sales to minors are often not imposed, because of varying standards, as well as a lack of knowledge on the part of licensing authorities.

Acts 1985, ch. 443, § 1; 1993, ch. 234, § 7; T.C.A., § 33-8-401; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 24; T.C.A. § 68-24-401.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 24 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-401 to § 33-10-401; however, § 68-24-401 was transferred to § 33-10-301 by the code commission.

33-10-302. Comprehensive treatment prevention program.

The department shall establish a comprehensive treatment program for substance abusing youth in this state. The program shall include residential care and treatment and necessary day treatment, outpatient and intervention services to support residential care.

As an alternative to building new facilities, the department may contract with hospitals or other health care institutions that provide the services required by this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 443, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, § 7; T.C.A., § 33-8-402; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 25; T.C.A. § 68-24-402; Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 24.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 25 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-402 to § 33-10-402; however, § 68-24-402 was transferred to § 33-10-302 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.